Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 37.1 Sexual Offender Registration and Community Notification
11-37.1-7.
Transfer of information to designated state law enforcement agency.

The person required to provide notice in accordance with §

11-37.1-5(b)

and the local law enforcement agencies required to register persons who have a duty to register in accordance with §

11-37.1-4

and receive changes in the person’s registration information under §

11-37.1-9

, shall immediately forward it to the designated state law enforcement agency. The designated state law enforcement agency shall immediately enter the information into the appropriate state law enforcement record system.

Whenever a person required to be registered under this chapter initially registers or updates his or her information, the designated state law enforcement agency shall immediately notify:

Any jurisdiction where the person is registered or is required to register due to the person’s residency, public or private educational institution attendance, or employment;

All jurisdictions where a person was required to register prior to the updated information being given;

All jurisdictions where a person intends to reside, work, or attend a public or private educational institution;

The Federal Bureau of Investigation or other federal agencies as designated by the Attorney General of the United States in order that the information may be updated on the National Sex Offender Registry or other relevant databases;

If the person intends to commence residency, attend a public or private educational institution, or commence employment outside of the United States, the United States Marshals Service;

Any agency, department, or program within the state that is responsible for criminal investigation, prosecution, child welfare, or sex offender supervision functions; and

National Child Protection Act agencies, which includes any agency responsible for conducting employment-related background checks under section 3 of the National Child Protection Act of 1993, 42 U.S.C. § 5119a.

The designated state law enforcement agency shall ensure there is an automated community notification process in place that ensures the following:

Upon a person’s initial registration or update of information, the state’s public sex offender registry website is immediately updated; and

The state’s public sex offender registry has a function that enables the general public to request an email notice that will notify them when a person commences residence, employment, or a public or private educational institution attendance with the state, within a specified zip code, or within a certain geographic radius. This email notice shall include the person’s identity so that the public can access the public registry for the new information.

The notification requirements of subsections (b)(7) and (c) do not apply to persons who were adjudicated delinquent of an offense requiring registration or a person tiered as a level 1 sex offender.

Notwithstanding the aforementioned notification requirements, the designated state law enforcement agency and local law enforcement agencies where the person resides, is employed, or attends a public or private educational institution, may utilize other forms of community notification consistent with the provisions and intent of this chapter.

In the event a person required to register under this chapter fails to register or fails to verify or update his or her registration information, the local law enforcement agency shall immediately inform the local law enforcement agency of the city or town where the person resides, is employed, or attends a public or private educational institution; the jurisdiction that provided notification that the person was to commence residency, employment, or public or private educational institution attendance; and the designated state law enforcement agency that the person failed to appear for registration or failed to verify or update their registration information.

Upon notification by the designated state law enforcement agency, the local law enforcement agency where the person resides, is employed, or attends a public or private educational institution, shall:

Make an effort to determine if the person is actually residing, employed or attending a public or private educational institution within their city or town; and

Seek a warrant for the person’s arrest for failing to register or verify or update his or her registration in compliance with this chapter. The U.S. Marshals Service or Federal Bureau of Investigation may be contacted in an attempt to obtain a federal warrant for the person’s arrest.

The designated state law enforcement agency shall update the registry to reflect that the person is not in compliance with his or her duty to register.

If the designated state law enforcement agency receives information that a person has absconded or local law enforcement cannot determine whether the person is actually residing, employed, or attending a public or private educational institution in the city or town using the measures outlined in subsection (f) of this section, the designated state law enforcement agency, with the assistance of local law enforcement, shall make an effort to determine if the person has actually absconded.

If the information indicating the possible absconding came through notice from another jurisdiction or federal authorities, they shall be informed that the person has failed to appear and register.

If an absconded person cannot be located then the designated state law enforcement agency shall take the following steps:

Update the registry to reflect the person has absconded or is otherwise not capable of being located;

Notify the local law enforcement agency where the person resides, is employed, or attends a public or private educational institution, so the local law enforcement agency can seek a warrant for the person’s arrest.

Notify the U.S. Marshals Service or Federal Bureau of Investigation so they may attempt, if necessary, to obtain a federal warrant for the person’s arrest;

Update the National Sex Offender Registry to reflect the sex offender’s status as an absconder, or is otherwise not capable of being located; and

Enter the person into the National Crime Information Center Wanted Person file.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 104, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 255, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 157, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 259, § 1.

11-37.1-8.
Verification of address.

For a person required to register under § 11-37.1-3(a)(1), (a)(2), (a)(6), (a)(7), (a)(8), or (a)(9) on each anniversary of the person’s initial registration date during the period in which the person is required to register:

The designated state law enforcement agency or local law enforcement agency shall mail a non-forwardable verification form to the last reported address of the person;

The person shall mail the verification form to the designated state law enforcement agency or local law enforcement agency within ten (10) days after receipt of the form;

The verification form shall be signed by the person, and state that the person still resides at the address last reported to the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the city or town in which the person having the duty to register resides; and

If the person fails to mail the verification form to the designated state law enforcement agency or local law enforcement agency within ten (10) days after receipt of the form, the person shall be in violation of this chapter unless the person proves that the person has not changed the residence address from that which he or she last registered.

The provisions of subsections (a)(1) — (a)(4) of this section shall apply to a person required to register under § 11-37.1-3(a)(3), (4), or (5), except that the registration address verification shall take place quarterly.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 104, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 255, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 162, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 170, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 157, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 259, § 1.

11-37.1-9.
Notification of local law enforcement agencies of changes in address.

Duty of local law enforcement agency; interstate and intrastate moves. For any person required to register under this chapter, the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction where the person is residing, shall, if the person changes residence to another jurisdiction or within the state, notify the law enforcement agency with which the person must register in the new jurisdiction, or the city or town within the state, and notify the designated jurisdiction law enforcement agency. The designated state law enforcement agency shall provide immediate notice as provided under §

11-37.1-7

.

Duty of person required to register; interstate moves. A person who has been convicted of an offense that required registration under this chapter shall register the new address with a designated state law enforcement agency in another jurisdiction to which the person moves in accordance with the new jurisdiction’s sex offender registration statute. Prior to the change of residence to a new jurisdiction, the person shall notify the local law enforcement agency within this state with which the person is registered of the intended move and of the new address within the new jurisdiction. The local law enforcement agency shall notify the designated state law enforcement agency and the designated state law enforcement agency shall provide immediate notice as provided under §

11-37.1-7

.

Duty of law enforcement agency; changes of residence within the state. For any person required to register under this chapter, the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction where the person is residing, shall, if the person changes residence to another city or town in Rhode Island, notify the local law enforcement agency with which the person must register in the new city or town and notify the designated state law enforcement agency. The designated state law enforcement agency shall provide immediate notice as provided under §

11-37.1-7

.

Duty of person required to register; changes of residence within the state. A person who has been convicted of an offense that requires registration under this chapter and who changes his or her residence address to another city or town in Rhode Island, shall notify the local law enforcement agency in the city or town from which the person is moving before the person establishes residence in the new location, and shall register with the local law enforcement agency in the city or town in which the person is moving not later than twenty-four (24) hours after the person establishes residence in the new city or town. A person who has been convicted of an offense that requires registration under this chapter and who changes his or her residence within a city or town in Rhode Island shall notify the local law enforcement agency in the city or town not later than twenty-four (24) hours after the person changes the residence within the city or town. The local law enforcement agency shall notify the designated state law enforcement agency and the designated state law enforcement agency shall provide immediate notice as provided under §

11-37.1-7

.

Duty of person required to register; changes in required registration information. A person who has been convicted of an offense that requires registration under this chapter shall immediately notify the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction where the person is residing, is employed, or attending a public or private educational institution of any changes to his or her required registration information as provided in §

11-37.1-3(e)

. The local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction shall also notify the designated state law enforcement agency. The designated state law enforcement agency shall provide immediate notice as provided under §

11-37.1-7

.

In the event of a change in temporary lodging, the person who have been convicted of an offense that requires registration under this chapter and the local law enforcement agency shall immediately notify the jurisdiction in which the person will be temporarily staying. The local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction shall also notify the designated state law enforcement agency who shall provide immediate notice as provided under §

11-37.1-7

.

In the event the person who has been convicted of an offense that requires registration under this chapter will be traveling outside of the United States, the person must notify the local law enforcement agency at least twenty-one (21) days in advance of the travel date and provide any necessary information regarding his or her international travel. The local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction shall also notify the designated state law enforcement agency. The designated state law enforcement agency shall provide immediate notice as provided under §

11-37.1-7

. Upon notification of a person’s intention to travel internationally, the designated state law enforcement agency shall immediately notify and provide the person’s travel information to the United States Marshals Service.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 104, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 255, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 162, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 170, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 155, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 202, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 157, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 259, § 1.

11-37.1-10.
Penalties.

Any person who is required to register or verify his or her address or give notice of a change of address or residence who knowingly fails to do so shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, be imprisoned not more than ten (10) years, or fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both.

Any person who is required to register or verify his or her address or give notice of a change of address or residence who knowingly fails to do so shall be in violation of the terms of his or her release, regardless of whether or not the term was a special condition of his or her release on probation, parole, home confinement or other form of supervised release.

Except in the case of a level-three (3) sex offender, any person who is required to register or verify his or her address, who knowingly resides within three hundred feet (300´) of any school as defined in §

11-37.1-2

, which distance shall be measured from the nearest boundary line of the real property supporting the residence of the person to the nearest boundary line of the real property that supports or upon which there exists a school shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, may be imprisoned not more than five (5) years, or fined not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.

Any level-three (3) sex offender who knowingly resides within one thousand feet (1,000´) of any school as defined in §

11-37.1-2

, which distance shall be measured from the nearest boundary line of the real property supporting the residence of the person to the nearest boundary line of the real property that supports or upon which there exists a school shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, may be imprisoned for not more than five (5) years, or fined not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 104, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 162, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 170, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 155, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 189, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 202, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 219, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 240, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 157, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 259, § 1.

11-37.1-11.
Release of information.

Except as otherwise provided by this chapter or as provided in subsection (b) or (c) of this section, no information obtained under this chapter shall be released or transferred without the written consent of the person or his or her authorized representative.

No consent for release or transfer of information obtained under this chapter shall be required in the following instances:

Information may be disclosed to law enforcement agencies for law enforcement purposes;

Information may be disclosed to government agencies conducting confidential background checks;

The designated state law enforcement agency and any local law enforcement agency authorized by the state agency may release relevant information that is necessary to protect individuals concerning a specific person required to register under this chapter, except that the identity of a victim of an offense that requires registration under this section shall not be released;

Information may be released or disseminated in accordance with the provisions of §

11-37.1-12

;

Information shall be disclosed by the local police department to the general public in a city or town for those registered offenders determined to be either a level 2 or level 3 offender as determined consistent with parole board guidelines; and

Information shall be disclosed by the local police department to the local school department for those registered offenders determined to be level 3 offenders by the parole board for the purposes of notifying parents of students whose school bus stop is within one thousand feet (1,000´) of a level 3 sex offender’s residence, which distance shall be measured from the nearest boundary line of the real property supporting the residence of the level 3 sex offender to the school bus stop.

Any local law enforcement agency shall release relevant information collected pursuant to §

11-37.1-3(c)

to any campus police agency appointed pursuant to §

16-52-2

or police for private institutions appointed pursuant to §

12-2.1-1

for any person having a duty to register who is enrolled in, employed by, or carrying on a vocation at an institution of higher education. That agency may release relevant information that is necessary to protect individuals concerning a specific person required to register under this chapter, except that the identity of a victim of an offense that requires registration under this section shall not be released.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 104, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 330, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 80, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 339, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 348, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 157, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 259, § 1.

11-37.1-12.
Rules and regulations for community notification.

The parole board shall promulgate guidelines and procedures for notification required pursuant to the provisions of this section.

The regulations shall provide for three (3) levels of notification depending upon the risk of re-offense level of the sex offender determined by the sex offender board of review as outlined in §

11-37.1-6(1)(b)

:

If risk of re-offense is low, law enforcement agencies and any individuals identified in accordance with the parole board guidelines shall be notified;

If risk of re-offense is moderate, organizations in the community likely to encounter the person registered shall be notified in accordance with the parole board’s guidelines, in addition to the notice required by subsection (b)(1);

If risk of re-offense is high, the members of the public likely to encounter the person registered shall be notified through means in accordance with the parole board’s guidelines designed to reach members of the public likely to encounter the person registered, in addition to the notice required by subsections (b)(1) and (b)(2).

The designated state law enforcement agency is authorized and directed to utilize the Rhode Island state police website and the Rhode Island unified court system website for the public release of identifying information of level two and level three sex offenders who have been convicted, provided that no identifying information of a juvenile shall be listed on the website.

The website shall have the capability of conducting searches by name, county, city, and town; and zip code and/or geographic radius.

The website shall include:

Links to sex offender safety and education resources;

Instructions on how a person can seek correction of information that the individual contends is erroneous;

A warning that the information contained on the website should not be used to unlawfully injure, harass, or commit a crime against any individual named in the registry or residing or working at any reported addresses and that any such action could result in civil or criminal penalties; and

All field search capabilities needed for full participation in the Dru Sjodin National Sex Offender Public website and shall participate in that website as provided by the attorney general of the United States.

The following information regarding the person required to register under this chapter shall be made available to the public on the website:

Notice that the person is in violation of his or her registration requirements or cannot be located if the person has absconded;

All offenses that require registration under this chapter for which the person has been convicted;

The offense(s) for which the person is currently registered;

The name of the person, including all aliases;

A current photograph of the person;

A physical description of the person; and

The person’s residential addresses and, if relevant, a description of a location where the person habitually lives or sleeps, and if the person is homeless;

The following information shall not be available to the public on the sex offender registry website:

Any arrest that did not result in conviction;

(II)

The person’s social security number;

(III)

Any travel documents;

(IV)

The identity of the victim;

(V)

Internet identifiers (as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 16911); and

(VI)

Any information of a person who was adjudicated delinquent of an offense requiring registration.

For persons who are under a witness protection program, the designated state law enforcement agency may honor the request of the United States Marshals Service or other agency responsible for witness protection by not including the original identity of the person on the publicly accessible sex offender registry website.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the sex offender review board shall have access to all relevant records and information in the possession of any state official or agency having a duty under §

11-37.1-5(a)(1)

through (6) relating to juvenile and adult offenders under review by the sex offender review board, including, but not limited to: police reports; prosecutors statements of probable cause; pre-sentence investigations and reports; complete judgments and sentences; current classification referrals; juvenile and adult criminal history records; violation and disciplinary reports; all psychological evaluations and psychiatric evaluations; psychiatric hospital records; sex offender evaluations and treatment reports; and substance abuse evaluations and treatment reports to the extent allowed by federal law. Records and information obtained by the sex offender review board under this subsection shall remain confidential, provided that the parole board may disclose the records and information to the board of review, the sentencing court, and law enforcement agencies in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 104, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 255, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 360, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 8; P.L. 2003, ch. 162, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 170, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 80, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 157, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 259, § 1.

11-37.1-13.
Notification procedures for tiers two (2) and three (3).

If after review of the evidence pertaining to a person required to register according to the criteria set forth in §

11-37.1-12

, the board is satisfied that risk of re-offense by the person required to register is either moderate or high, the sex offender community notification unit of the parole board shall notify the person, in writing, by letter or other documentation:

That community notification will be made not less than ten (10) business days from the date of the letter or other document evidencing an intent to promulgate a community notice in accordance with §

11-37.1-12(b)

, together with the level, form and nature that the notification will take;

That unless an application for review of the action is filed within the time specified by the letter or other documentation, which in any case shall not be less than ten (10) business days, by the adult offender subject to community notification, with the criminal calendar judge of the superior court for the county in which the adult offender who is the subject of notification resides or intends to reside upon release, or by the juvenile offender subject to community notification over whom the family court exercises jurisdiction, with the clerk of the family court for the county in which the juvenile offender resides or intends to reside upon release, whose name shall be specified in the letter or other document, requesting a review of the determination to promulgate a community notification, that notification will take place;

That the person has a right to be represented by counsel of their own choosing or by an attorney appointed by the court, if the court determines that he or she cannot afford counsel; and

That the filing of an application for review may be accomplished, in the absence of counsel, by delivering a letter objecting to the notification and/or its level, form or nature, together with a copy of the letter or other documentation describing the proposed community notification, addressed to the judge described in the communication to the clerk of the superior court in the county in which the adult offender resides or intends to reside upon release, or in the case of juvenile offenders over whom the family court exercises jurisdiction, addressed to the judge described in the communication to the clerk of the family court in the county in which the juvenile offender resides or intends to reside upon release.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 104, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 40, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 227, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 255, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 162, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 170, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 410, § 7; P.L. 2010, ch. 103, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 109, § 1.

11-37.1-14.
Preliminary proceedings on objection to community notification — Procedures.

Upon receipt of a request from a person subject to community notification under §

11-37.1-12(b)

, the superior court, or the family court of the county in which the person resides or intends to reside upon release, shall:

Set a date for hearing and decision on the matter;

Provide notice of the date for the hearing to both the applicant or his or her counsel and to the attorney general;

Appoint counsel for the applicant if he or she cannot afford one; and

Direct that the attorney general promptly provide copies of all papers, documents and other materials which formed the basis for the determination of the level and manner of community notification be provided to the court and the applicant or his or her counsel.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 104, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 40, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 227, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 255, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 410, § 7.

11-37.1-15.
Application hearing procedures.

On the date set for the hearing on the review of the application the court shall:

In camera, review the materials provided in accordance with §

11-37.1-14(4)

;

Determine whether and to what extent the production of witnesses and cross examination shall be required or permitted depending on the complexities of the matter involved, the extent of doubt concerning the correctness of the level, nature and extent of the notification proposed; and

Presume the need for a prompt determination.

In any application hearing proceeding the rules of evidence shall not apply and the court may rely on documentary presentations, including expert opinion on all issues.

Nothing in this section should be construed to allow the applicant to relitigate the adjudication of guilt.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 104, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 162, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 170, § 1.

11-37.1-16.
Application review — Burden of production and persuasion.

In any proceeding under this chapter, the state shall have the burden of going forward, which burden shall be satisfied by the presentation of a prima facie case that justifies the proposed level of and manner of notification.

For purposes of this section, “prima facie case” means:

A validated risk assessment tool has been used to determine the risk of re-offense;

Reasonable means have been used to collect the information used in the validated assessment tool.

Upon presentation of a prima facie case, the court shall affirm the determination of the level and nature of the community notification, unless it is persuaded by a preponderance of the evidence that the determination on either the level of notification of the manner in which it is proposed to be accomplished is not in compliance with this chapter or the guidelines adopted pursuant to this chapter.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the release of information pertaining to a person who has been convicted of any of the violations of any offense listed in §

11-37.1-2

, so long as the information has been gathered or obtained through sources other than the registration process provided by this chapter. Provided further, that nothing in this section shall be deemed to authorize the release of any information pertaining to any victim of any offense listed in §

11-37.1-2

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 104, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 162, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 170, § 1.

11-37.1-17.
Immunity for good faith conduct.

Any person who performs any act or fails to perform any act pursuant to this chapter shall have good faith immunity from any liability, civil or criminal, that might be incurred as a result of the performance of or the failure to perform any act pursuant to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 104, § 1.

11-37.1-18.
Continuation of prior duty to register.

Any person who pursuant to the provisions of former § 11-37-16 had a duty to register under that section after having been convicted of any violation of the provisions of chapter 37 of this title, or for a conviction in another state of first degree sexual assault which if committed in this state would constitute a violation of chapter 37 of this title, shall have the duty to register in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. Nothing in this section shall be construed to abrogate any duty to register which exists or existed under the provisions of former § 11-37-16.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 104, § 1.

11-37.1-19.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid or unconstitutional, the invalidity or unconstitutionality shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid or unconstitutional provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 104, § 1.

11-37.1-20.
Remand to sex offender board of review.

Upon application by the attorney general or counsel for the sex offender, the court may remand any case pending adjudication of sexually violent predator status back to the sex offender board of review for further determination of sexually violent predator status and community notification level pursuant to §

11-37.1-6

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 162, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 170, § 2.

11-37.1-21.
Duty of shelters and homeless shelters to notify law enforcement of the presence of sex offenders.

If any person convicted of any offense that requires sex offender registration pursuant to this title, or otherwise has a duty to register his or her address with the law enforcement agency in the municipality in which they reside, is provided residence in any homeless shelter, that person shall be required to inform the shelter of his or her status and duty to register and to provide his or her name and date of birth to each shelter or homeless shelter where he or she resides overnight.

The obligation of the sex offender to provide the information required in subsection (a) of this section, shall be on a continuing daily and nightly basis and he or she shall provide said information to each and every shelter or homeless shelter at which he or she takes up temporary residence regardless of the length of time he or she stays at such shelter.

The homeless shelter that receives information from any sex offender shall be required to transmit that information to the local law enforcement agency and if there be none, to the closest Rhode Island state police barracks before midnight of that day of the offender registering or signing in for the day, night, or any portion of a day.

Any homeless shelter that violates the provisions of this section shall upon a first violation, be fined a civil penalty of up to five hundred dollars ($500); for a second violation, by a civil penalty of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000); and for a third or subsequent violation, by a civil penalty of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000).

Jurisdiction over any violation by a homeless shelter shall be in the district court in the county in which the shelter is physically located.

Any sex offender who fails to disclose information as required by this chapter shall be subject to the same penalties as set forth in §

11-37.1-10

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 233, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 325, § 1.